District of Columbia statutes.
14-505

Municipal ordinances and regulations.

Municipal ordinances and regulations in force in the District of Columbia may be proved by producing in evidence a copy thereof certified as provided by the Commissioner [Mayor]; and the certified copy is prima facie evidence of the due adoption and promulgation of the ordinances and regulations.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 143(6)
1981 Ed., § 14-505.
1973 Ed., § 14-505.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made, in brackets, in this section.